Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SCHOOL SAFETY AID AND GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin School district aid. new text end new text begin For fiscal year 2027 only, the school safety aid for a school district equals $....... times the district's adjusted pupil units. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Charter school aid. new text end new text begin For fiscal year 2027 only, the school safety aid for a charter school equals $....... times the charter school's adjusted pupil units. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Intermediate district and cooperative unit aid. new text end new text begin (a) For fiscal year 2027 only, the school safety aid for an intermediate school district equals $....... times the sum of the adjusted pupil units of the intermediate district's member school districts. new text end new text begin (b) For fiscal year 2027 only, the cooperative unit school safety aid attributable to a school district that is not a member of an intermediate school district equals $....... times the school district's adjusted pupil units. A school district must designate only one cooperative unit as the recipient of its cooperative unit school safety aid in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. A school district's cooperative unit safe schools aid must be paid to the cooperative unit in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. For purposes of this section, a cooperative unit has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 123A.24, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Tribal contract school aid. new text end new text begin For fiscal year 2027 only, school safety aid for an American Indian Tribal contract school eligible for aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.83, equals $....... times the average daily membership served of the school. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Nonpublic schools; grants. new text end new text begin A nonpublic school may apply for a school safety grant in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. For purposes of this section, nonpublic school has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.41, subdivision 9. The commissioner must prioritize grant awards to nonpublic schools with lower fiscal capacity, according to criteria developed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Eligible uses. new text end new text begin Aid or grant funds awarded under this section may be used to pay the costs of: new text end new text begin (1) purposes described under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.44, subdivision 4; or new text end new text begin (2) activities to address student attendance and absenteeism, including but not limited to addressing risk factors for high absenteeism through supports and interventions; strategies that focus on the individual needs of each student; personalized outreach to students who have stopped attending school, including home visits and connecting with students in community centers or other public areas; regular meetings with students to provide tutoring or other supports or to connect students with resources that provide tutoring or other supports; activities that increase students' sense of belonging in the school community; data analysis to assess the effectiveness of district strategies; and technology that assists districts' efforts to communicate with students and families. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; SCHOOL SAFETY AID AND GRANT.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for school safety aid under section 1. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for school safety grants to nonpublic schools under section 1. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to ... percent of the appropriation is available for grant administration. new text end